Utah statutes.
53-10-107.   Admissibility in evidence of certified copies of division files.

A copy of any fingerprint, record, document, or other evidence in the files of the division, certified by the commissioner to be a true copy of the original, is admissible in evidence in the same manner as the original.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 263, 1998 General Session

